Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.030

Candidates for judicial office—Special elections to fill vacancies—Contribution limits—Adjustments. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) No person may make contributions to a candidate for judicial office that in the aggregate exceed *one thousand six hundred dollars for each election in which the candidate is on the ballot or appears as a write-in candidate. Contributions made with respect to a primary may not be made after the date of the primary. However, contributions to a candidate or a candidate's authorized committee may be made with respect to a primary until 30 days after the primary, subject to the following limitations: (a) The candidate lost the primary; (b) the candidate's authorized committee has insufficient funds to pay debts outstanding as of the date of the primary; and (c) the contributions may only be raised and spent to satisfy the outstanding debt. Contributions made with respect to a general election may not be made after the final day of the applicable election cycle.

(2) This section through RCW 29B.40.220 apply to a special election conducted to fill a vacancy in an office. However, the contributions made to a candidate or received by a candidate for a primary or special election conducted to fill such a vacancy will not be counted toward any of the limitations that apply to the candidate or to contributions made to the candidate for any other primary or election.

(3) No person may accept contributions that exceed the contribution limitations provided in this section.

(4) The dollar limits in this section must be adjusted according to RCW 29B.20.050.

[ 2024 c 164 s 445; 2010 c 204 s 603; 2006 c 348 s 2. Formerly RCW 42.17A.410, 42.17.645.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The dollar amounts in this section may have been adjusted for inflation by rule of the commission adopted under the authority of RCW 29B.20.050. For current dollar amounts, see WAC 390-05-400.

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.